Hawaii statutes.
§803-43 Devices to intercept wire, oral, or
electronic communications and advertising of same prohibited; penalty;
forfeiture. Any person, other than a provider of wire or electronic
communication service and its duly authorized officers, employees, and agents,
or any person acting under color of law, who, in this State, intentionally
manufactures, assembles, possesses, or distributes, or who attempts to
distribute, any electronic, mechanical, or other device, knowing or having
reason to know that the device or the design of the device renders it primarily
useful for the purpose of surreptitious interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communications, or who intentionally places an advertisement of any
such device or promotes the use of any such device in any newspaper, magazine,
handbill, or other publication, shall be guilty of a class C felony. Any such
electronic, mechanical, or other device in violation of this section shall be
subject to seizure and forfeiture under chapter 712A. [L 1978, c 218, pt of §2;
am L 1986, c 303, §3; am L 1989, c 164, §5; am L 2006, c 200, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next